Maryland, session 2026, HB0960.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
SUBTITLE 7. FEDERAL EMPLOYEE–TO–ENTREPRENEUR PROGRAM.
3–701.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE FEDERAL
EMPLOYEE–TO–ENTREPRENEUR PROGRAM.
3–702.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0960*

HOUSE BILL 960
(A) THERE IS A FEDERAL EMPLOYEE–TO–ENTREPRENEUR PROGRAM IN
THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE FORMER OR
TRANSITIONING FEDERAL EMPLOYEES WITH TRAINING, TOOLS, AND MENTORSHIP
NECESSARY FOR SUCCESSFULLY TRANSITIONING TO ENTREPRENEURSHIP.
(C) (1) EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE PROGRAM SHALL SERVE FOUR COHORTS
OF 15 INDIVIDUALS.
(2) FOR EACH COHORT, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE:
(I) SESSIONS ON ENTREPRENEURIAL EXPLORATION AND
BUSINESS AND CAPITAL READINESS;
(II) ONE–ON–ONE COACHING FOR EACH PARTICIPANT;
(III) TRAINING IN BUSINESS PLANNING, COMPLIANCE,
MARKETING, BUDGETING, AND PITCH DEVELOPMENT; AND
(IV) TOOLS TO CREATE A BUSINESS PLAN AND A CAPITAL
READINESS STRATEGY.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH APPLICATION PROCEDURES FOR AN INDIVIDUAL TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) DEVELOP A CURRICULUM FOR THE PROGRAM.
(E) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $400,000 TO THE DEPARTMENT TO
CARRY OUT THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.